Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF5033.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; ORGANIZATION OF LIBERIANS IN MINNESOTA.new text end new text begin $250,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the workforce development fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to the Organization of Liberians in Minnesota (OLM) for a workforce development training program for Minnesota residents, prioritizing Black, Indigenous, and people of color communities and Liberian residents in health care and industrial trades. OLM shall serve as the lead administrator, coordinating with accredited training providers, community colleges, employers, and government partners to deliver sector-focused training and credential attainment. Money may be used for participant stipends, tuition, fees, training materials, equipment, credentialing exams, and supportive services such as transportation and child care. The program shall aim for credential attainment and job placement within six months of completion, with annual progress reports outlining enrollment, credentials earned, and placements. The base for this appropriation is $250,000 in fiscal year 2028 and $0 in fiscal year 2029. new text end